Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1204
Department; coordinating and technical assistance agency; contracts authorized.

The department shall be the principal state agency responsible for coordinating public transportation activities in the state and, when requested, shall provide technical assistance to improve Nebraska's public transportation system. The department may contract pursuant to the Nebraska Public Transportation Act to assist state agencies, political subdivisions, and public and qualified public-purpose organizations to provide public transportation services as specified in the act.

Laws 1975, LB 443, § 8;

Laws 1981, LB 144, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-3904;

Laws 1993, LB 158, § 3.